Illinois, session 104th, SB3431.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Regulatory Sunset Act is amended by 5changing Sections 5 and 6 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 80/5)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1905)7    Sec. 5. Study and report. In the calendar year 2 years 8before a regulatory agency or program is scheduled for 9termination, the The Governor's Office of Management and 10Budget shall study the performance of each regulatory agency 11and program scheduled for termination under this Act and 12report annually to the Governor the results of such study, 13including in the report an analysis of whether the agency or 14program restricts a profession, occupation, business, 15industry, or trade any more than is necessary to protect the 16public health, safety, or welfare from significant and 17discernible harm or damage, and recommendations with respect 18to those agencies and programs the Governor's Office of 19Management and Budget determines should be terminated, 20modified, or continued by the State. The Governor shall review 21the report of the Governor's Office of Management and Budget 22and, no later than December 1st of the year preceding the year 23of termination, in each even-numbered year make   SB3431- 2 -LRB104 19480 BDA 32928 b1recommendations to the General Assembly on the termination, 2modification, or continuation of regulatory agencies and 3programs. 4(Source: P.A. 102-984, eff. 1-1-23.) 5    (5 ILCS 80/6)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1906)6    Sec. 6. Factors to be studied. In conducting the study 7required under Section 5, the Governor's Office of Management 8and Budget shall consider, but is not limited to consideration 9of, the following factors in determining whether an agency or 10program should be recommended for termination, modification, 11or continuation:12        (1) the full range and variety of practices and 13    activities included in the scope of practice covered by 14    the agency or program, including modes of practice or 15    subspecialties that have developed since the last review;16        (1.5) the extent to which the profession, occupation, 17    business, industry, or trade licensed, supervised, 18    controlled, issued rules, or otherwise regulated by the 19    agency or program is restricted in other states or 20    territories; 21        (2) (blank);22        (3) the extent to which the regulatory agency or 23    program has operated in the public interest, and the 24    extent to which its operation has been impeded or enhanced 25    by existing statutes, procedures, and practices of any   SB3431- 3 -LRB104 19480 BDA 32928 b1    other department of State government, and any other 2    circumstances, including budgetary, resource, and 3    personnel matters;4        (4) the extent to which the agency running the program 5    has recommended statutory changes to the General Assembly 6    that would benefit the public as opposed to the persons it 7    regulates;8        (5) the extent to which the agency or program has 9    required the persons it regulates to report to it 10    concerning the impact of rules and decisions of the agency 11    or the impact of the program on the public regarding 12    improved service, economy of service, and availability of 13    service;14        (6) the extent to which persons regulated by the 15    agency or under the program have been required to assess 16    problems in their industry that affect the public;17        (7) the extent to which the agency or program has 18    encouraged participation by the public in making its rules 19    and decisions as opposed to participation solely by the 20    persons it regulates and the extent to which such rules 21    and decisions are consistent with statutory authority;22        (8) the efficiency with which formal public complaints 23    filed with the regulatory agency or under the program 24    concerning persons subject to regulation have been 25    processed to completion, by the executive director of the 26    regulatory agencies or programs, by the Attorney General   SB3431- 4 -LRB104 19480 BDA 32928 b1    and by any other applicable department of State 2    government;3        (9) the extent to which changes are necessary in the 4    enabling laws of the agency or program to adequately 5    comply with the factors listed in this Section;6        (10) the extent to which there is evidence of 7    significant and discernible harm arising from the full 8    range and variety of practices and activities included in 9    the scope of practice;10        (11) the substance, content, and relevance of the 11    personal qualifications required for entry into the trade, 12    business, profession, occupation, or industry being 13    regulated, including, but not limited to, as required 14    hours of training, required curricula during the required 15    hours, knowledge areas tested in examinations, and any 16    updates that have been made since the last review to 17    address changes in technology or modes of practice;18        (12) the extent to which all the personal 19    qualifications that the agency or program requires for 20    individuals to enter the trade, business, profession, 21    occupation, or industry being regulated are necessary to 22    protect the public from significant and discernible harm, 23    for all activities covered by the scope of practice; 24        (13) equity concerns arising from the personal 25    qualifications, including:26            (A) financial impact on aspiring licensees,   SB3431- 5 -LRB104 19480 BDA 32928 b1        including, but not limited to, (i) itemization of 2        average costs of achieving personal qualifications; 3        (ii) an assessment of average incomes of licensees; 4        and (iii) numbers, monetary loss, and demographics of 5        individuals who start but do not achieve personal 6        qualifications or complete the application process;7            (B) challenges for individuals from historically 8        disadvantaged backgrounds in acquiring personal 9        qualifications;10            (C) barriers for individuals with records of 11        interactions with the criminal justice system;12            (D) evidence of challenges for individuals who do 13        not speak English as their primary language; and14            (E) geographic distribution of training sites and 15        test sites; and 16        (14) the extent to which enforcement actions under the 17    agency or program have addressed significant and 18    discernible harms to the public as opposed to technical 19    noncompliance with the requirements of the agency or 20    program.21(Source: P.A. 102-984, eff. 1-1-23.)